Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2473.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 49, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 49-707 and 49-708, to read: START_STATUTE49-707. Municipal composting program; rules The director shall adopt rules to ESTABLISH a MUNICIPAL COMPOSTING program THAT PROVIDEs grants to MUNICIPALITIES to establish a curbside composting collection program. The department shall ADMINISTER the MUNICIPAL composting program. Rules adopted PURSUANT to this section shall Prescribe ELIGIBILITY criteria. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE49-708. Municipal composting program fund A. The municipal composting program fund is established consisting of monies appropriated by the legislature and monies collected pursuant to section 49-922.01. The department shall administer the fund. Monies in the fund are subject to legislative appropriation and are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. B. Monies in the municipal composting program fund shall be used as follows: 1. To administer the imported hazardous waste management program pursuant to section 49-922.01. 2. To administer the municipal composting program pursuant to section 49-707. 3. To award grants to eligible municipalities pursuant to section 49-707. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 49, chapter 5, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 49-922.01, to read: START_STATUTE49-922.01. Imported hazardous waste management program; rules; applicability A. notwithstanding any other law, The director shall adopt rules to establish an imported hazardous waste management program. b. rules adopted PURSUANT to this section shall establish criteria, standards and fees for MANAGING waste that is not CLASSIFIED as HAZARDOUS waste in this state but is CLASSIFIED as HAZARDOUS waste in the state where it is GENERATED, including for all of the following: 1. TRANSPORTATION. 2. TREATMENT. 3. storage. 4. DISPOSAL. c. the director shall DEPOSIT, PURSUANT to sections 35-146 and 35-147, FEES collected PURSUANT to this section in the municipal composting program fund ESTABLISHED by SECTION 49-708. D. This section does not apply to waste that is GENERATED in this state. END_STATUTE